Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3823
(UTC 302) Holder of power of appointment or power to terminate an interest.

(UTC 302) The holder of a power of appointment or other power to terminate an interest may
represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers
in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 23;

Laws 2013, LB38, § 1.